Louisiana, session 2026, SB431.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:1734(F) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:1734(G)
through (I) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1734. Gate fees; other fees; excessive charges; prohibitions; cause of action
* * *
F. For purposes of this Section, any towing or storage company
conducting nonconsensual towing operations from private property shall make
themselves available for the release of personal property or the vehicle, outside
normal business hours, exclusive of legal holidays and certain exempted hours.
G. For purposes of this Section, any towing or storage company
conducting nonconsensual towing operations from private property that is
unavailable to the public for the timely release of personal property or the
vehicle shall not charge the requester a storage fee the day of the facility closure
or unavailability, exclusive of legal holidays and certain exempted hours,
suspending future storage fees until the next day of normal business hours.
H. The office of state police may adopt rules and regulations in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as necessary to implement
the provisions of this Section, including but not limited to establishing the
exempted hours.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 431 ENROLLED
I. The administrative and mailing fees for filing the Official Report of Stored
Vehicles for in-state and out-of-state notifications shall be determined by the Public
Service Commission.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.